District of Columbia statutes.
24-251.06

Institutional review committees.

There shall be established, within each facility and institution of the Department, an institutional review committee composed of a psychologist, a senior correctional officer, and an academician. Each committee shall be appointed by the Director, or his designee. It shall be the function of each committee to examine the progress and adjustments of the residents of the facility or institution in which the committee was established, and to make recommendations to the appropriate person with respect to the applications for furloughs of such residents. In making such recommendations, each committee shall rely generally upon consideration of the applicant’s disciplinary record, psychological evaluation, work and training participation, and attitudinal and behavior adjustment.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-130, § 7, 23 DCR 9694
This section is referenced in § 24-251.01.
1981 Ed., § 24-486.
1973 Ed., § 24-486.